Utah statutes.
63M-11-204.   Annual report by the commission.
(1)  The commission shall annually prepare and publish a report directed to
the:
(a)  governor; and
(b)  Health and Human Services Interim Committee.
(2)  The report described in Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  describe how the commission fulfilled its statutory purposes and duties
during the year; and
(b)  contain recommendations on how the state should act to address issues
relating to the aging population.
